California statutes. Commercial Code
(i) It arose in the course of the claimant’s business or profession.

(ii) It does not include damages arising out of personal injury to or the death of an individual.

(14) “Commodity account” means an account maintained by a commodity intermediary in which a commodity contract is carried for a commodity customer.

(15) “Commodity contract” means a commodity futures contract, an option on a commodity futures contract, a commodity option, or another contract if the contract or option is either of the following:

(A) Traded on or subject to the rules of a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market for such a contract pursuant to federal commodities laws.

(B) Traded on a foreign commodity board of trade, exchange, or market, and is carried on the books of a commodity intermediary for a commodity customer.

(16) “Commodity customer” means a person for which a commodity intermediary carries a commodity contract on its books.

(17) “Commodity intermediary” means a person that is either of the following:

(A) Is registered as a futures commission merchant under federal commodities law.

(B) In the ordinary course of its business provides clearance or settlement services for a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market pursuant to federal commodities law.

(18) “Communicate” means to do any of the following:

(A) To send a written or other tangible record.

(B) To transmit a record by any means agreed upon by the persons sending and receiving the record.

(C) In the case of transmission of a record to or by a filing office, to transmit a record by any means prescribed by filing-office rule.

(19) “Consignee” means a merchant to which goods are delivered in a consignment.

(20) “Consignment” means a transaction, regardless of its form, in which a person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of sale and all of the following conditions are
 satisfied:

(A) The merchant satisfies all of the following conditions:

(i) They deal in goods of that kind under a name other than the name of the person making delivery.

(ii) They are not an auctioneer.

(iii) They
 are not generally known by its creditors to be substantially engaged in selling the goods of others.

(B) With respect to each delivery, the aggregate value of the goods is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more at the time of delivery.

(C) The goods are not consumer goods immediately before delivery.

(D) The transaction does not create a security interest that secures an obligation.

(21) “Consignor” means a person that delivers goods to a consignee in a consignment.

(22) “Consumer debtor” means a debtor in a consumer transaction.

(23) “Consumer goods” means goods that are used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(24) “Consumer-goods transaction” means a consumer transaction in which both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) An individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(B) A security interest in consumer goods secures the obligation.

(25) “Consumer obligor” means an obligor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation as part of a transaction entered into primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(26) “Consumer transaction” means a transaction in which (i) an individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, (ii) a security interest secures the obligation, and (iii) the collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. The term includes consumer-goods transactions.

(27) “Continuation statement” means an amendment of a financing statement which does both of the following:

(A) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates.

(B) Indicates that it is a continuation statement for, or that it is filed to continue the effectiveness of, the identified
 financing statement.

(28) “Debtor” means any of the following:

(A) A person having an interest, other than a security interest or other lien, in the collateral, whether or not the person is an obligor.

(B) A seller of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

(C) A consignee.

(29) “Deposit account” means a demand, time, savings, passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank. The term does not include investment property or accounts evidenced by an instrument.

(30) “Document” means a document
 of title or a receipt of the type described in subdivision (b) of Section 7201.

(31) [Reserved]

(32) “Encumbrance” means a right, other than an ownership interest, in real property. The term includes mortgages and other liens on real property.

(33) “Equipment” means goods other than inventory, farm products, or consumer goods.

(34) “Farm products” means goods, other than standing timber, with respect to which the debtor is engaged in a farming operation and which are any of the following:

(A) Crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including both of the following:

(i) Crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes.

(ii) Aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations.

(B) Livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations.

(C) Supplies used or produced in a farming operation.

(D) Products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured states.

(35) “Farming operation” means raising, cultivating, propagating, fattening, grazing, or any other farming, livestock, or aquacultural operation.

(36) “File number”
 means the number assigned to an initial financing statement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9519.

(37) “Filing office” means an office designated in Section 9501 as the place to file a financing statement.

(38) “Filing-office rule” means a rule adopted pursuant to Section 9526.

(39) “Financing statement” means a record or records composed of an initial financing statement and any filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

(40) “Fixture filing” means the filing of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and satisfying subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9502. The term includes the filing of a financing
 statement covering goods of a transmitting utility which are or are to become fixtures.

(41) “Fixtures” means goods that have become so related to particular real property that an interest in them arises under real property law.

(42) “General intangible” means any personal property, including things in action, other than accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, goods, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of credit, money, and oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction. The term includes payment intangibles and software.

(43) [Reserved]

(44) “Goods” means all things that are movable when a
 security interest attaches. The term includes (i) fixtures, (ii) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a conveyance or contract for sale, (iii) the unborn young of animals, (iv) crops grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the crops are produced on trees, vines, or bushes, and (v) manufactured homes. The term also includes a computer program embedded in goods and any supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program if (i) the program is associated with the goods in such a manner that it customarily is considered part of the goods, or (ii) by becoming the owner of the goods, a person acquires a right to use the program in connection with the goods. The term does not include a computer program embedded in goods that consist solely of the medium in which the program is embedded. The term also does not include accounts, chattel paper, commercial
 tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, general intangibles, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of credit, money, or oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction.

(45) “Governmental unit” means a subdivision, agency, department, county, parish, municipality, or other unit of the government of the United States, a state, or a foreign country. The term includes an organization having a separate corporate existence if the organization is eligible to issue debt on which interest is exempt from income taxation under the laws of the United States.

(46) “Health care insurance receivable” means an interest in or claim under a policy of insurance which is a right to payment of a monetary obligation for health care goods or services provided or to be
 provided.

(47) “Instrument” means a negotiable instrument or any other writing that evidences a right to the payment of a monetary obligation, is not itself a security agreement or lease, and is of a type that in ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery with any necessary indorsement or assignment. The term does not include (i) investment property, (ii) letters of credit, (iii) writings that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the
 card, or (iv) writings that evidence chattel paper.

(48) “Inventory” means goods, other than farm products, which are any of the following:

(A) Leased by a person as lessor.

(B) Held by a person for sale or lease or to be furnished under a contract of service.

(C) Furnished by a person under a contract of service.

(D) Consist of raw materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in a business.

(49) “Investment property” means a security, whether certificated or uncertificated, security entitlement, securities account,
 commodity contract, or commodity account.

(50) “Jurisdiction of organization,” with respect to a registered organization, means the jurisdiction under whose law the organization is formed or organized.

(51) “Letter-of-credit right” means a right to payment or performance under a letter of credit, whether or not the beneficiary has demanded or is at the time entitled to demand payment or performance. The term does not include the right of a beneficiary to demand payment or performance under a letter of credit.

(52) (A) “Lien creditor” means any of the following:

(i) A creditor that has acquired a lien on the property involved by attachment, levy,
 or the like.

(ii) An assignee for benefit of creditors from the time of assignment.

(iii) A trustee in bankruptcy from the date of the filing of the petition.

(iv) A receiver in equity from the time of appointment.

(B) “Lien creditor” does not include a creditor who by filing a notice with the Secretary of State has acquired only an attachment or judgment lien on personal property, or both.

(53) “Manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body-feet or more in width or 40 body-feet or more in length, or, when erected on
 site, is 320 or more square feet, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein. The term includes any structure that meets all of the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under Title 42 of the United States Code.

(54) “Manufactured home transaction” means a secured transaction that satisfies either of the following:

(A) It creates a purchase money security interest in
 a manufactured home, other than a manufactured home held as inventory.

(B) It is a secured transaction in which a manufactured home, other than a manufactured home held as inventory, is the primary collateral.

(55) “Mortgage” means a consensual interest in real property, including fixtures, which secures payment or performance of an obligation.

(56) “New debtor” means a person that becomes bound as debtor under subdivision (d) of Section 9203 by a security agreement previously entered into by another person.

(57) “New value” means (i) money, (ii) money’s worth in property, services, or new credit, or (iii) release by a transferee of an
 interest in property previously transferred to the transferee. The term does not include an obligation substituted for another obligation.

(58) “Noncash proceeds” means proceeds other than cash proceeds.

(59) “Obligor” means a person that, with respect to an obligation secured by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on the collateral, (i) owes payment or other performance of the obligation, (ii) has provided property other than the collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation, or (iii) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment or other performance of the obligation. The term does not include issuers or nominated persons under a letter of credit.

(60) “Original
 debtor,” except as used in subdivision (c) of Section 9310, means a person that, as debtor, entered into a security agreement to which a new debtor has become bound under subdivision (d) of Section 9203.

(61) “Payment intangible” means a general intangible under which the account debtor’s principal obligation is a monetary obligation. The term includes a controllable payment intangible.

(62) “Person related to,” with respect to an individual, means any of the following:

(A) The spouse of the individual.

(B) A brother, brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of the individual.

(C) An ancestor or
 lineal descendant of the individual or the individual’s spouse.

(D) Any other relative, by blood or marriage, of the individual or the individual’s spouse who shares the same home with the individual.

(63) “Person related to,” with respect to an organization, means any of the following:

(A) A person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the organization.

(B) An officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, the organization.

(C) An officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, a
 person described in subparagraph (A).

(D) The spouse of an individual described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C).

(E) An individual who is related by blood or marriage to an individual described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) and shares the same home with the individual.

(64) “Proceeds,” except as used in subdivision (b) of Section 9609, means any of the following property:

(A) Whatever is acquired upon the sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition of collateral.

(B) Whatever is collected on, or distributed on account of, collateral.

(C) Rights arising out of collateral.

(D) To the extent of the value of collateral, claims arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or interference with the use of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to, the collateral.

(E) To the extent of the value of collateral and to the extent payable to the debtor or the secured party, insurance payable by reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to, the collateral.

(65) “Promissory note” means an instrument that evidences a promise to pay a monetary obligation, does not evidence an order to pay, and does not contain an acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has received for deposit a sum of money or funds.

(66) “Proposal” means a record signed by a secured party that includes the terms on which the secured party is willing to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures pursuant to Sections 9620, 9621, and 9622.

(67) “Public finance transaction” means a secured transaction in connection with which all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) Debt securities are issued.

(B) All or a portion of the securities issued have an initial stated maturity of at least 20 years.

(C) The debtor, obligor, secured party, account debtor or other person obligated on collateral,
 assignor or assignee of a secured obligation, or assignor or assignee of a security interest is a state or a governmental unit of a state.

(68) “Public organic record” means a record that is available to the public for inspection and is any of the following:

(A) A record consisting of the record initially filed with or issued by a state or the United States to form or organize an organization and any record filed with or issued by the state or the United States that amends or restates the initial record.

(B) An organic record of a business trust consisting of the record initially filed with a state and any record filed with the state that amends or restates the initial record, if a statute of the state governing business
 trusts requires that the record be filed with the state.

(C) A record consisting of legislation enacted by the legislature of a state or the Congress of the United States which forms or organizes an organization, any record amending the legislation, and any record filed with or issued by the state or the United States which amends or restates the name of the organization.

(69) “Pursuant to commitment,” with respect to an advance made or other value given by a secured party, means pursuant to the secured party’s obligation, whether or not a subsequent event of default or other event not within the secured party’s control has relieved or may relieve the secured party from its obligation.

(70) “Record,” except as used
 in “for record,” “of record,” “record or legal title,” and “record owner,” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or which is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(71) “Registered organization” means an organization formed or organized solely under the law of a single state or the United States by the filing of a public organic record with, the issuance of a public organic record by, or the enactment of legislation by the state or the United States. The term includes a business trust that is formed or organized under the law of a single state if a statute of the state governing business trusts requires that the business trust’s organic record be filed with the state.

(72) “Secondary obligor” means an obligor to the extent that either
 of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The obligor’s obligation is secondary.

(B) The obligor has a right of recourse with respect to an obligation secured by collateral against the debtor, another obligor, or property of either.

(73) “Secured party” means any of the following:

(A) A person in whose favor a security interest is created or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not any obligation to be secured is outstanding.

(B) A person that holds an agricultural lien.

(C) A consignor.

(D) A person to which accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold.

(E) A trustee, indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent, or other representative in whose favor a security interest or agricultural lien is created or provided for.

(F) A person that holds a security interest arising under Section 2401, 2505, 4210, or 5118, or under subdivision (3) of Section 2711 or subdivision (5) of Section 10508.

(74) “Security agreement” means an agreement that creates or provides for a security interest.

(75) [Reserved]

(76) “Software” means a computer program and any supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program. The term does not include a computer program that is included in the definition of goods.

(77) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(78) “Supporting obligation” means a letter-of-credit right or secondary obligation that supports the payment or performance of an account, chattel paper, document, general intangible, instrument, or investment property.

(79) [Reserved]

(80) “Termination statement” means an amendment of a financing statement that does both of the following:

(A) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates.

(B) Indicates either that it is a termination statement or that the identified financing statement is no longer effective.

(81) “Transmitting utility” means a person primarily engaged in the business of any of the following:

(A) Operating a railroad, subway, street railway, or trolley bus.

(B) Transmitting communications electrically, electromagnetically,
 or by light.

(C) Transmitting goods by pipeline or sewer.

(D) Transmitting or producing and transmitting electricity, steam, gas, or water.

(82) “Assignee,” except as used in “assignee for benefit of creditors,” means a person (A) in whose favor a security interest that secures an obligation is created or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not the obligation is outstanding or (B) to which an account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note has been sold. The term includes a person to which a security interest has been transferred by a secured party.

(83) “Assignor” means a person that (A) under a security agreement creates
 or provides for a security interest that secures an obligation or (B) sells an account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note. The term includes a secured party that has transferred a security interest to another person.

(84) “Controllable account” means an account evidenced by a controllable electronic record that provides that the account debtor undertakes to pay the person that has control under Section 12105 of the controllable electronic record.

(85) “Controllable payment intangible” means a payment intangible evidenced by a controllable electronic record that provides that the account debtor undertakes to pay the person that has control under Section 12105 of the controllable electronic record.

(86) “Electronic money” means money in an electronic form.

(87) “Money” has the same meaning as in paragraph (24) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201, but does not include (A) a deposit account or (B) money in an electronic form that cannot be subjected to control under Section 9105.1.

(88) “Tangible money” means money in a tangible form.

(b) The following definitions in other divisions apply to this division:“Applicant”Section 5102.“Beneficiary”Section 5102.“Broker”Section 8102.“Certificated security”Section 8102.“Check”Section 3104.“Clearing corporation”Section 8102.“Contract for sale”Section 2106.“Control”Section 7106.“Controllable electronic record”Section
 12102.“Customer”Section 4104.“Entitlement holder”Section 8102.“Financial asset”Section 8102.“Holder in due course”Section 3302.“Issuer” (with respect to a letter of credit or
 letter-of-credit right)
Section 5102.“Issuer” (with respect to a security)Section 8201.“Issuer” (with respect to documents of title)Section 7102.“Lease”Section 10103.“Lease agreement”Section 10103.“Lease contract”Section 10103.“Leasehold interest”Section
 10103.“Lessee”Section 10103.“Lessee in ordinary course of business”Section 10103.“Lessor”Section 10103.“Lessor’s residual interest”Section 10103.“Letter of credit”Section 5102.“Merchant”Section 2104.“Negotiable instrument”Section 3104.“Nominated
 person”Section 5102.“Note”Section 3104.“Proceeds of a letter of credit”Section 5114.“Protected purchaser”Section 8303.“Prove”Section 3103.“Qualifying purchaser”Section 12102.“Sale”Section 2106.“Securities account”Section
 8501.“Securities intermediary”Section 8102.“Security”Section 8102.“Security certificate”Section 8102.“Security entitlement”Section 8102.“Uncertificated security”Section 8102.(c) Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general
 definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 24.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Purchase money collateral” means goods or software that secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to that collateral.

(2) “Purchase money obligation” means an obligation of an obligor incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral or for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of the collateral if the value is in fact
 so used.

(b) A security interest in goods is a purchase money security interest as follows:

(1) To the extent that the goods are purchase money collateral with respect to that security interest.

(2) If the security interest is in inventory that is or was purchase money collateral, also to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to other inventory in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest.

(3) Also to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to software in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest.

(c) A security
 interest in software is a purchase money security interest to the extent that the security interest also secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to goods in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The debtor acquired its interest in the software in an integrated transaction in which it acquired an interest in the goods.

(2) The debtor acquired its interest in the software for the principal purpose of using the software in the goods.

(d) The security interest of a consignor in goods that are the subject of a consignment is a purchase money security interest in inventory.

(e) In a transaction other than a consumer-goods transaction, if the extent to
 which a security interest is a purchase money security interest depends on the application of a payment to a particular obligation, the payment must be applied as follows:

(1) In accordance with any reasonable method of application to which the parties agree.

(2) In the absence of the parties’ agreement to a reasonable method, in accordance with any intention of the obligor manifested at or before the time of payment.

(3) In the absence of an agreement to a reasonable method and a timely manifestation of the obligor’s intention, in the following order:

(A) To obligations that are not secured.

(B) If more than one obligation is secured, to obligations secured by purchase money security
 interests in the order in which those obligations were incurred.

(f) In a transaction other than a consumer-goods transaction, a purchase money security interest does not lose its status as such, even if any of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The purchase money collateral also secures an obligation that is not a purchase money obligation.

(2) Collateral that is not purchase money collateral also secures the purchase money obligation.

(3) The purchase money obligation has been renewed, refinanced, consolidated, or restructured.

(g) In a transaction other than a consumer-goods transaction, a secured party claiming a purchase money security interest has the burden of establishing
 the extent to which the security interest is a purchase money security interest.

(h) The limitation of the rules in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) to transactions other than consumer-goods transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of the proper rules in consumer-goods transactions. The court may not infer from that limitation the nature of the proper rule in consumer-goods transactions and may continue to apply established approaches.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

(a) A secured party has control of a deposit account if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The secured party is the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

(2) The debtor, secured party, and bank have agreed in a signed record that the bank will comply with instructions originated by the secured party directing disposition of the funds in the deposit account without further consent by the debtor.

(3) The secured party becomes the bank’s customer with respect to the deposit account.

(4) Another person, other than the debtor, satisfies either of the following conditions:

(A) The person has control of the deposit account and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the secured party.

(B) The person obtains control of the deposit account after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the deposit account on behalf of the secured party.

(b) A secured party that has satisfied subdivision (a) has control, even if the debtor retains the right to direct the disposition of funds from the deposit account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 25.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

(a) A purchaser has control of an authoritative electronic copy of a record evidencing chattel paper if a system employed for evidencing the assignment of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the
 purchaser as the person to which the authoritative electronic copy was assigned.

(b) A system satisfies subdivision (a) if the record or records evidencing the chattel paper are created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) A single authoritative copy of the record or records exists which is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6), unalterable.

(2) The authoritative copy identifies the purchaser as the assignee of the record or records.

(3) The authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the purchaser or its designated
 custodian.

(4) Copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the purchaser.

(5) Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy.

(6) Any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

(c) A system satisfies subdivision (a), and a purchaser has control of an authoritative electronic copy of a record evidencing chattel paper, if the electronic copy, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic copy, or a system in which the electronic
 copy is recorded satisfies each of the following conditions:

(1) It enables the purchaser readily to identify each electronic copy as either an authoritative copy or a nonauthoritative copy.

(2) It enables the purchaser readily to identify itself in any way, including by name, identifying number, cryptographic key, office, or account number, as the assignee of the authoritative electronic copy.

(3) It gives the purchaser exclusive power, subject to subdivision (d), to do both of the following:

(A) Prevent others from adding or changing an identified assignee of the authoritative electronic copy.

(B) Transfer control of the authoritative electronic copy.

(d) Subject to subdivision (e), a power is exclusive under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) even if either of the following is true:

(1) The authoritative electronic copy, a record attached to or logically associated with the authoritative electronic copy, or a system in which the authoritative electronic copy is recorded limits the use of the authoritative electronic copy or has a protocol programmed to cause a change, including a transfer or loss of control.

(2) The power is shared with another person.

(e) A power of a purchaser is not shared with another person under
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) and the purchaser’s power is not exclusive if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The purchaser can exercise the power only if the power also is exercised by the other person.

(2) Either of the following is true:

(A) The other person can exercise the power without exercise of the power by the purchaser.

(B) The other person is the transferor to the purchaser of an interest in the chattel paper.

(f) If a purchaser has the powers specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the powers are presumed to be exclusive.

(g) A purchaser has control of an authoritative electronic copy of a record evidencing chattel paper if another person, other than the transferor to the purchaser of an interest in the chattel paper, satisfies either of the following conditions:

(1) The other person has control of the authoritative electronic copy and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the purchaser.

(2) The other person obtains control of the authoritative electronic copy after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the electronic copy on behalf of the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 26.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.1.

(a) A person has control of electronic money if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The electronic money, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic money, or a system in which the electronic money is recorded gives the person all of the following:

(A) Power to avail itself of substantially all the benefit from the electronic money.

(B) Exclusive power, subject to subdivision (b), to do both of the following:

(i) Prevent others from availing
 themselves of substantially all the benefit from the electronic money.

(ii) Transfer control of the electronic money to another person or cause another person to obtain control of other electronic money as a result of the transfer of the electronic money.

(2) The electronic money, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic money, or a system in which the electronic money is recorded enables the person readily to identify itself in any way, including by name, identifying number, cryptographic key, office, or account number, as having the powers under paragraph (1).

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a power is exclusive under clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) even
 if either of the following is true:

(1) The electronic money, a record attached to or logically
 associated with the electronic money, or a system in which the electronic money is recorded limits the use of the electronic money or has a protocol programmed to cause a change, including a transfer or loss of control.

(2) The power is shared with another person.

(c) A power of a person is not shared with another person under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and the person’s power is not exclusive if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The person can exercise the power only if the power also is exercised by the other person.

(2) Either of the following is true:

(A) The
 other person can exercise the power without exercise of the power by the person.

(B) The other person is the transferor to the person of an interest in the electronic money.

(d) If a person has the powers specified in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the powers are presumed to be exclusive.

(e) A person has control of electronic money if another person, other than the transferor to the person of an interest in the electronic money, satisfies either of the following conditions:

(1) The other person has control of the electronic money and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the person.

(2) The other person obtains control of the electronic money after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the electronic money on behalf of the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 27.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

(a) A person has control of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement as provided in Section 8106.

(b) A secured party has control of a commodity contract if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The secured party is the commodity intermediary with which the commodity contract is carried.

(2) The commodity customer, secured party, and commodity intermediary have agreed that the commodity intermediary will apply any value distributed on account of the commodity contract as directed by the secured party without further consent by the commodity customer.

(c) A secured party having control of all security entitlements or commodity contracts carried in a securities account or commodity account has control over the securities account or commodity account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

A secured party has control of a letter-of-credit right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or any nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under subdivision (c) of Section 5114 or otherwise applicable law or practice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.1.

(a) A secured party has control of a controllable electronic record as provided in Section 12105.

(b) A secured party has control of a controllable account or controllable payment intangible if the secured party has control of the controllable electronic record that evidences the controllable account or controllable payment intangible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 28.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.2.

(a) A person that has control under Section 9104, 9105, or 9105.1 is not required to acknowledge that it has control on behalf of another person.

(b) If a person acknowledges that it has or will obtain control on behalf of another person, unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this division otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the other person and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 29.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9108.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), a description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), a description of collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the collateral by any of the following:

(1) Specific
 listing.

(2) Category.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), a type of collateral defined in this code.

(4) Quantity.

(5) Computational or allocational formula or procedure.

(6) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), any other method, if the identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.

(c) A description of collateral as “all the debtor’s assets” or “all the debtor’s personal property” or using words of similar import does not reasonably identify the collateral.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), a description